src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/proper-odd_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable propers belonging to LONDON-plc, PLACE-DIM-plc, DUORTNUS-plc, RANES-plc, CAVKKUS-plc, ANAR-mal, BALAK-plc, SARAK-plc, GUOLBBA-plc, ADJAGAT-plc, EATNAMAT-plc, ANGELIT-org

Tests:
  Proper - Siglufjörđur: # LONDON-plc
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Siglufjörđura
    Siglufjörđur+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Siglufjörđura, Siglufjörđur]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ["Siglufjörđur:a", Siglufjörđur-a]
    Siglufjörđur+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ["Siglufjörđur:a", "Siglufjörđur:", Siglufjörđur-a, Siglufjörđur-]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Siglufjörđurii
    Siglufjörđur+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Siglufjörđurii
    Siglufjörđur+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: ["Siglufjörđur:ii", Siglufjörđur-ii]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill: ["Siglufjörđur:ii", Siglufjörđur-ii]
    Siglufjörđur+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: ["Siglufjörđur:i", Siglufjörđur-i]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: ["Siglufjörđur:i", Siglufjörđur-i]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: siglufjörđurlažžii

  Proper - Silbabološ: # PLACE-DIM-plc
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Silbaboloža
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Silbabološ
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Silbaboložii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: silbaboložlažžii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: silbaboložlažžai

  Proper - Vállášvuomus: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Vállášvupmosa
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Vállášvupmos
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Vállášvupmosii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: vállášvuomuslažžii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: vállášvuomuslažžii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: vállášvuomuslažžai
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: vállášvuomuslažžai
  
  Proper - Ráneš: # RANES-plc
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Rátnáha
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Rátnát
    Ráneš+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Ráneš
    Ráneš+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Ráneža
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Rátnáhii
    Ráneš+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Ránežii
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: ránešlažžii
    Ráneš+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: ránežlažžii
    Ráneš+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: ránežlažžai

  Proper - Čávkkus: # RANES-plc
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Čávkoha
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Čávkot
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Čavkosa
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Čavkos
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Čávkohii
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Čavkosii
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: čávkkuslažžii
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: čavkkuslažžii
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: čavkkuslažžii
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: čavkkuslažžai
    Čávkkus+Err/Orth+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: čavkkuslažžai

  Proper - Guorpak: # BALAK-plc
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Guorpaga
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Guorpak
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Guorpagii
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: guorpaklažžii
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: guorpaklažžai
    
  Proper - Harrok: # SARAK-plc
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Harroha
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Harrok
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Harrohii
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: harroklažžii
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: harroklažžai


  Proper - Ánddir: # ANAR-mal
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ánddira
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc: Ánddir
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Ánddir
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánddirii

  Proper - Kruvnnasavu: # GUOLBBA-plc
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Kruvnnasavvona
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen: Kruvnnasavvon
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kruvnnasavvonii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: kruvnnasavulažžii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: kruvnnasavulažžii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: kruvnnasavulažžai
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: kruvnnasavulažžai
    
  Proper - Njárgalássát: # ADJAGAT-plc
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Skoahppaádjagiid
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Skoahppaádjagiidda
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: skoahppaájalažžii
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: skoahppaájalažžii
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: skoahppaájalažžai
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: skoahppaájalažžai
    
  Proper - Dálvasnjaŋgguhat: # EATNAMAT-plc
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiid
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiidda
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžai
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžai
    
  Proper - Angelit: # ANGELIT-org
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Gen: Angeliid
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Angeliidda
